Washington statutes.
RCW 36.150.060

Preservation of existing rights, proceedings, and actions—Levies.

No transfer of any function made pursuant to this chapter may be construed to impair or alter any existing rights acquired under RCW 36.54.110 through 36.54.190 or any other provision of law relating to county ferry districts, nor as impairing or altering any actions, activities, or proceedings validated thereunder, nor as impairing or altering any civil or criminal proceedings instituted thereunder, nor any rule, regulation, or order promulgated thereunder, nor any administrative action taken thereunder; and neither the assumption of control of any county ferry district function by a county, nor any transfer of rights, powers, functions, and obligations as provided in this chapter, may impair or alter the validity of any act performed by such county ferry district or division thereof or any officer thereof prior to the assumption of such rights, powers, functions, and obligations by any county as authorized by this chapter. Furthermore, an ad valorem property tax levy upon real and personal property authorized under RCW 36.54.130 and levied by a county as authorized under this chapter must be treated as a levy by a county ferry district for all purposes including, but not limited to, limitations on levies contained in RCW 84.52.043.

[ 2014 c 51 s 6.]